Washington statutes.
RCW 44.68.090

Administrative committee members—Travel expenses.

Members of the administrative committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 44.04.120 or 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, as appropriate, while attending meetings of their respective committees or on other official business authorized by their respective committees.

[ 2020 c 114 s 15; 1986 c 61 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 114: See note following RCW 28A.175.075.